New Mexico, session 2026, SB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 31-18-16 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1977, Chapter 216, Section 5, as amended) is amended to read: "31-18-16. USE, BRANDISHING OR DISCHARGE OF FIREARM--ALTERATION OF BASIC SENTENCE--SUSPENSION AND DEFERRAL LIMITED.-- A. When a separate finding of fact by the court or jury shows that a firearm was used in relation to a drug transaction or during the commission of aggravated burglary pursuant to Section 30-16-4 NMSA 1978 or a serious violent offense, the basic sentence of imprisonment prescribed for the offense in Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978 shall be increased by [one year] two years, except that when the offender is a serious youthful offender or a youthful offender who received an adult sentence, the sentence imposed by this subsection may be increased by one year. B. When a separate finding of fact by the court or jury shows that a firearm was brandished in the commission of a noncapital felony, the basic sentence of imprisonment prescribed for the offense in Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978 shall be increased by [three] six years, except that when the offender is a serious youthful offender or a youthful offender that received an adult sentence, the sentence imposed by this subsection may be increased by one year. C. When a separate finding of fact by the court or jury shows that a firearm was discharged in the commission of a noncapital felony, the basic sentence of imprisonment prescribed for the offense in Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978 shall be increased by [five] ten years, except that when the offender is a serious youthful offender or a youthful offender who received an adult sentence, the sentence imposed by this subsection may be increased by three years. D. For a second or subsequent offense, when a separate finding of fact by the court or jury shows that a firearm was used, brandished, or discharged in relation to a drug transaction or during the commission of aggravated burglary pursuant to Section 30-16-4 NMSA 1978 or a serious violent offense, the sentence shall be increased by [five] ten years, except that when the offender is a serious youthful offender or a youthful offender, the sentence imposed by this section may be increased by three years. E. If the case is tried before a jury and if a prima facie case has been established showing that a firearm was used, brandished or discharged in relation to a drug transaction or during the commission of aggravated burglary pursuant to Section 30-16-4 NMSA 1978 or a serious violent offense, the court shall submit the issue to the jury by special interrogatory. If the case is tried by the court, the court shall decide the issue and shall make a separate finding of fact thereon. F. When a separate finding of fact by the court or jury shows that a firearm was used, brandished or discharged in relation to a drug transaction or during the commission of aggravated burglary pursuant to Section 30-16-4 NMSA 1978 or a serious violent offense, the firearm is subject to seizure and forfeiture as an instrumentality pursuant to the provisions of the Forfeiture Act. G. As used in this section: (1) "brandished" means displaying or making a firearm known to another person while the firearm is present on the person of the offending party with intent to intimidate or injure a person; (2) "in relation to a drug transaction" means participating or attempting to participate in the trafficking of a controlled substance pursuant to Section 30-31-20 NMSA 1978, distribution of a controlled substance to a minor pursuant to Section 30-31-21 NMSA 1978 or distribution of a controlled or counterfeit substance pursuant to Section 30-31-22 NMSA 1978 as a seller, purported seller or as an accomplice; and (3) "serious violent offense" means an offense enumerated in Subparagraphs (a) through (n) of Paragraph (4) of Subsection [L] N of Section 33-2-34 NMSA 1978." - 4 -